Utah statutes.
63G-4-502.   Emergency adjudicative proceedings.

(1)  An agency may issue an order on an emergency basis without complying with the requirements of this chapter if:

(a)  the facts known by the agency or presented to the agency show that an immediate and significant danger to the public health, safety, or welfare exists; and

(b)  the threat requires immediate action by the agency.

(2)  In issuing its emergency order, the agency shall:

(a)  limit its order to require only the action necessary to prevent or avoid the danger to the public health, safety, or welfare;

(b)  issue promptly a written order, effective immediately, that includes a brief statement of findings of fact, conclusions of law, and reasons for the agency's utilization of emergency adjudicative proceedings; and

(c)  give immediate notice to the persons who are required to comply with the order.

(3)  If the emergency order issued under this section will result in the continued infringement or impairment of any legal right or interest of any party, the agency shall commence a formal adjudicative proceeding in accordance with the other provisions of this chapter.

